Indiana, session 2026, HB1284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.6-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 105, IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]. Sec. 4.
(a) Except for a tax rate that has an expiration date, and except as
provided in section 3(f) of this chapter (before its expiration), a tax rate
remains in effect until the effective date of an ordinance that increases,
decreases, or rescinds that tax rate.
(b) A tax rate may not be changed more than once each year under
this article.
(c) A local income tax expenditure tax rate that is imposed in a
county under IC 6-3.6-6 continues in effect after December 31, 2027,
only if the adopting body adopts an ordinance to renew the expenditure
tax rate beginning January 1, 2028. An ordinance under this subsection
must be adopted by the adopting body on or before October 1, 2027, as
set forth in section 3(b)(1) of this chapter. However, this subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit an adopting body that fails to adopt
an ordinance to continue an expenditure tax rate after December 31,
2027, from adopting an ordinance under this article to impose, renew,
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


or modify an expenditure tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6 beginning January
1, 2029, or any year thereafter.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.6-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 118, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to all
counties.
(b) The adopting body may by ordinance and subject to subsections
(c) through (e) (d) impose one (1) or more of the following component
rates not to exceed a total expenditure tax rate under this chapter of two
and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) on the adjusted gross income of
taxpayers who reside in the county:
(1) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%)
seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) for general purpose revenue
for county services (as provided in section 4 of this chapter),
subject to subsection (c).
(2) A tax rate not to exceed four-tenths of one percent (0.4%)
two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) for providers of fire protection
and emergency medical services located within the county (as
provided in section 4.3 of this chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(3) A tax rate not to exceed two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) for
general purpose revenue for distribution to nonmunicipal civil
taxing units (excluding fire protection districts) located within the
county (as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter), subject to
subsection (c).
(4) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%)
one and nine-tenths percent (1.9%) for general purpose revenue
for municipal services for distribution to municipalities located
within the county that are not eligible to adopt a municipal tax
rate under section 22 of this chapter or that have made an election
under section 23(b)(3) of this chapter to be treated as such.
(c) The combined component rates imposed by an adopting body
under subsection (b)(1) through (b)(3) shall not exceed one and
seven-tenths percent (1.7%). one percent (1%).
(d) A tax rate adopted under subsection (b)(4) may only be imposed
on taxpayers who do not reside in a municipality that is eligible to
adopt a municipal tax rate under section 22 of this chapter.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, a tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire on December 31 of each calendar year. An
adopting body wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in
the succeeding year must pass an ordinance to readopt a tax rate in
accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3. This subsection applies regardless of
whether there is a modification in the tax rate or the component rates
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


or the rates are unchanged from the previous year.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.6-6-4.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 127, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.3. (a) Revenue raised from a tax
rate for fire protection and emergency medical services under section
2(b)(2) of this chapter shall be distributed by the county to each fire
protection district and fire protection territory and municipal fire
department located within the county. At the discretion of the county
council, the county may distribute revenue raised from a tax rate for
fire protection and emergency medical services under section 2(b)(2)
of this chapter to municipal fire departments, township fire
departments, and volunteer fire departments.
(b) Revenue raised from a tax rate for fire protection and emergency
medical services under section 2(b)(2) of this chapter shall be allocated
to each fire protection district and fire protection territory, municipal
fire department, and, if applicable, municipal fire departments,
township fire departments, and volunteer fire departments, based on the
following formula:
STEP ONE: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the population
living within the service boundaries of the provider using the
most recent federal decennial census.
STEP TWO: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the number of
square miles within the service boundaries of the provider.
STEP THREE: For each provider of fire protection and
emergency medical services located within the county that is
eligible to receive revenue under this section, determine the
product of:
(A) the STEP TWO amount; multiplied by
(B) twenty (20).
STEP FOUR: THREE: For each provider of fire protection and
emergency medical services located within the county that is
eligible to receive revenue under this section, determine the sum
of:
(A) the STEP ONE result; plus
(B) the STEP THREE TWO result.
STEP FIVE: FOUR: Determine the sum total of the STEP FOUR
THREE results for each provider of fire protection and
emergency medical services located within the county that is
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


eligible to receive revenue under this section.
STEP SIX: FIVE: The percentage of revenue that shall be
distributed to each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section is equal to:
(A) the STEP FOUR THREE result for the provider; divided
by
(B) the STEP FIVE FOUR result.
SECTION 4. IC 6-3.6-6-4.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Revenue raised from a tax rate for
nonmunicipal civil taxing units under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter
may be distributed by the county to nonmunicipal civil taxing units
subject to the provisions of this section.
(b) Subject to the maximum aggregate tax rate of not more than
two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter,
the adopting body may adopt a tax rate for each type of nonmunicipal
civil taxing unit. which may not exceed more than five-hundredths of
one percent (0.05%) for any given unit type. The revenue raised from
a tax rate for a specific type of nonmunicipal civil taxing unit shall be
allocated to all nonmunicipal civil taxing units of that same type
located within the county on a pro rata per capita basis, subject to
subsection (e).
(c) A county solid waste management district (as defined in
IC 13-11-2-47) or a joint solid waste management district (as defined
in IC 13-11-2-113) is not an eligible nonmunicipal civil taxing unit for
the purpose of receiving an allocation of general purpose revenue under
this chapter unless a majority of the members of each of the county
fiscal bodies of the counties within the district passes a resolution
approving the distribution.
(d) A resolution passed by a county fiscal body under subsection (c)
may:
(1) expire on a date specified in the resolution; or
(2) remain in effect until the county fiscal body revokes or
rescinds the resolution.
(e) A nonmunicipal civil taxing unit wishing to receive a share of
revenue under this section in a year must adopt a resolution requesting
the distribution from the county and must provide a certified copy of
the resolution to the adopting body not later than July 1 of the year
immediately preceding the distribution year. Not later than August 1 of
the year immediately preceding the distribution year, the adopting body
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


shall hold a public hearing on the resolution requesting the distribution
and provide the public with notice of the time and place where the
public hearing will be held. The notice must be given in accordance
with IC 5-3-1 and include a description of the resolution requesting the
distribution from the county.
(f) If a nonmunicipal civil taxing unit adopts a resolution under this
subsection subsection (e) and provides the resolution to the adopting
body as set forth in this that subsection, the county shall distribute to
the nonmunicipal civil taxing unit an amount of revenue raised from
the tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter for the distribution
year as set forth in subsection (f). (g).
(g) If one (1) or more, but not all, nonmunicipal civil taxing units
adopt a resolution under subsection (e) requesting a distribution in a
given year, the county may either distribute the total amount of revenue
raised from the tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter to only
those nonmunicipal civil taxing units that have provided a resolution
request, or the county may distribute the total amount of revenue raised
from a tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter to all nonmunicipal
civil taxing units as set forth in this section. If no nonmunicipal civil
taxing units adopt a resolution to request a distribution in a given year,
the county may retain the revenue raised from a tax rate for
nonmunicipal civil taxing units for that year and use the revenue as
general purpose revenue for the county under section 4 of this chapter.
SECTION 5. IC 6-3.6-6-6.1, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6.1. (a) Revenue raised from a tax rate for certain
cities and towns under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter may be
distributed by the county to those cities and towns subject to the
provisions of this section.
(b) Subject to subsection (g), the revenue raised from a tax rate
under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be allocated to the cities and
towns based on the population of the city or the population of the town,
whichever is applicable, compared to the population of all the cities or
the population of all the towns, whichever is applicable, that are
eligible for a distribution, subject to subsection (d). For purposes of this
determination, if the boundaries of a city or town are located in more
than one (1) county, only the portion of the population of the city or
town that is located within the county imposing the tax rate under
section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be considered.
(c) The money may be used by the city or town fiscal body for any
of the purposes of the city or town, including public safety (as defined
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


in IC 6-3.6-2-14) and economic development purposes described in
IC 6-3.6-10. The city or town fiscal body may pledge its general
purpose revenue to the payment of bonds or to lease payments as set
forth in this chapter.
(d) An eligible city or town wishing to receive a share of revenue
under this section in a year must adopt a resolution requesting the
distribution from the county and must provide a certified copy of the
resolution to the adopting body not later than July 1 of the year
immediately preceding the distribution year. Not later than August 1 of
the year immediately preceding the distribution year, the adopting body
shall hold a public hearing on the resolution requesting the distribution
and provide the public with notice of the time and place where the
public hearing will be held. The notice must be given in accordance
with IC 5-3-1 and include a description of the resolution requesting the
distribution from the county.
(e) Subject to subsection (g), if an eligible city or town adopts a
resolution under this subsection subsection (d) and provides the
resolution to the adopting body as set forth in this that subsection, the
county shall distribute to the eligible city or town unit an amount of
revenue raised from the tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter
for the distribution year as set forth in subsection (f).
(f) Subject to subsection (g), if one (1) or more, but not all, eligible
cities or towns adopt a resolution under subsection (d) requesting a
distribution in a given year, the county may either distribute the total
amount of revenue raised from the tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this
chapter to only those eligible cities or towns that have provided a
resolution request, or the county may distribute the total amount of
revenue raised from a tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter to
all eligible cities or towns as set forth in this section. If no eligible city
or town adopts a resolution to request a distribution in a given year, the
county may retain the revenue raised from a tax rate for the eligible city
or town for that year and use the revenue as general purpose revenue
for the county under section 4 of this chapter.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section, if
an adopting body that imposes a tax rate of one and two-tenths percent
(1.2%) seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) under section 2(b)(1) of
this chapter subsequently adopts an ordinance to concurrently impose
a tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter:
(1) seventy-five percent (75%) of the revenue received from the
tax rate imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be
retained by the county and may be used for the purposes
described in section 4 of this chapter; and
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


(2) twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenue received from the
tax rate imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be
distributed among the eligible cities and towns as set forth in this
section and may be used for the purposes set forth in this section.
However, the adopting body may, by ordinance, determine to allocate
any percentage of the revenue that would otherwise be retained by the
county under subdivision (1) to instead be allocated among the eligible
cities and towns under subdivision (2).
SECTION 6. IC 6-3.6-6-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 147, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this section,
"municipality" means only a city or town that:
(1) has a population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) two
thousand (2,000) or more; and
(2) in the case of a city or town whose population decreased in the
most recent federal decennial census from three thousand five
hundred (3,500) two thousand (2,000) or more to less than three
thousand five hundred (3,500), two thousand (2,000), has elected
by ordinance to continue to use its previous population of three
thousand five hundred (3,500) two thousand (2,000) or more as
set forth in section 23(b)(2) of this chapter for purposes of the
allocation determination under section 6.1 of this chapter.
The term does not include a city or town that has made an election
under section 23(b)(3) of this chapter.
(b) Beginning after December 31, 2027, the fiscal body of a
municipality may by ordinance and subject to subsection (e), impose
a local income tax rate on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers
in the municipality that does not exceed one and two-tenths percent
(1.2%). one and nine-tenths percent (1.9%).
(c) The following apply if a municipality imposes a local income tax
rate under this section:
(1) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality under this
section applies only to local taxpayers within the territory of the
municipality.
(2) The local income tax is imposed in addition to a tax imposed
by the county in which the municipality is located in accordance
with IC 6-3.6-4-1(a) and IC 6-3.6-4-1(c).
(3) The following provisions of this article apply to a local income
tax rate imposed by a municipality under subsection (b):
(A) IC 6-3.6-3 (adoption of the tax), including the effective
date of an ordinance under IC 6-3.6-3-3.3.
(B) IC 6-3.6-4 (imposition of the tax), except that IC 6-3.6-4-2
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


and IC 6-3.6-4-3 do not apply.
(C) IC 6-3.6-8 (administration of the tax).
(4) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality shall apply
to professional athletes who compete in the municipality, unless
exempted under IC 6-3-2-27.5 or other provision of law.
(d) The amount of the tax revenue that is from the local income tax
rate imposed under this section and that is collected for a calendar year
shall be treated as general purpose revenue and must be distributed to
the fiscal officer of the municipality that imposed the tax before July 1
of the next calendar year.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, a tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire on December 31 of each calendar year. A
municipality wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in the
succeeding year must pass an ordinance to readopt a tax rate in
accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3.3. This subsection applies regardless of
whether there is a modification in the tax rate or the rate is unchanged
from the previous year.
SECTION 7. IC 6-3.6-6-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 148, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 23. (a) This section applies in
determining the population of a city or town for the purposes of this
chapter.
(b) The following apply:
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3), the population
of a city or town is the population of the city or town that is
reported by the 2020 federal decennial census. most recent
distribution factors report prepared by the state comptroller.
(2) Beginning after 2030, if the population of a city or town:
(A) increases from a population of less than three thousand
five hundred (3,500), two thousand (2,000), as reported by
the distribution factors report prepared by the state
comptroller for the immediately preceding federal decennial
census, year, to a population of three thousand five hundred
(3,500) two thousand (2,000) or more, as reported by the most
recent federal decennial census, distribution factors report
prepared by the state comptroller, or, if applicable, any
corrected population count (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-1.5)
issued for the city or town in the year succeeding the most
recent federal decennial census; distribution factors report
prepared by the state comptroller; or
(B) decreases from a population of three thousand five
hundred (3,500) two thousand (2,000) or more, as reported by
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


the distribution factors report prepared by the state
comptroller for the immediately preceding federal decennial
census, year, to a population of less than three thousand five
hundred (3,500), two thousand (2,000), as reported by the
most recent federal decennial census, distribution factors
report prepared by the state comptroller, or, if applicable,
any corrected population count (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-1.5)
issued for the city or town in the year succeeding the most
recent federal decennial census; distribution factors report
prepared by the state comptroller;
the fiscal body of the city or town may adopt an ordinance on or
before September 1 of the calendar year immediately succeeding
the most recent federal decennial census distribution factors
report prepared by the state comptroller to continue to use the
population of the city or town as reported by the distribution
factors report prepared by the state comptroller for the
immediately preceding federal decennial census year and the
resulting determination for the city or town under section 22 of
this chapter, notwithstanding the increase or decrease in its
population as reported by the most recent federal decennial
census distribution factors report prepared by the state
comptroller as described in this subdivision. An ordinance
adopted under this subdivision shall take effect on January 1 of
the calendar year that immediately succeeds the year in which the
ordinance is adopted. The fiscal officer of the city or town shall
provide a certified copy of an ordinance adopted under this
subdivision to the department of local government finance.
(3) This subdivision applies only to cities and towns with a
population of more than three thousand five hundred (3,500) two
thousand (2,000) but less than seven thousand (7,000).
thirty-four thousand (34,000). Notwithstanding any other
provision, a fiscal body of a city or town may adopt an ordinance
to elect to be treated as if the city's or town's population is less
than three thousand five hundred (3,500) two thousand (2,000)
for purposes of a county local income tax rate and distribution
under this chapter. An ordinance adopted under this subdivision
shall take effect on January 1 of the calendar year that
immediately succeeds the year in which the ordinance is adopted.
The fiscal officer of the city or town shall provide a certified copy
of an ordinance adopted under this subdivision to the department
of local government finance. An ordinance adopted by a city or
town under this subdivision is not revocable and shall not expire
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125


following the next federal decennial census. distribution factors
report prepared by the state comptroller.
2026 IN 1284—LS 6836/DI 125